Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [260C.009] FOSTER YOUTH BILL OF RIGHTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Legislative intent. new text end new text begin (a) It is the intent of the legislature and the purpose of this section to ensure foster youth have the right to receive at least the level of care in which their nonfoster youth peers receive, and a higher level of care than the care they would have received if not placed in foster care, due to the state of Minnesota choosing to intervene in a foster youth's life. new text end new text begin (b) The rights under this section are established for the benefit of children and youth in foster care and the extended foster care program. The rights under this section do not replace or diminish other rights, liberties, and responsibilities that may exist regarding children and youth in foster care or the extended foster care program, including any rights under the Indian Child Welfare Act, the Minnesota Indian Family Preservation Act, and the African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Abuse" has the meaning given in section 260C.007, subdivision 5. For the purposes of this section, abuse also includes name calling, derogatory statements about the foster youth or the foster youth's family, insults, harassment, threats, shaming, humiliation, and hate speech. new text end new text begin (c) "Age appropriate" means the activities, rights, and responsibilities that align with a foster youth's chronological age and are common to their peers. new text end new text begin (d) "Appropriate" means in alignment with age and developmental ability of a foster youth, often based on the reasonable treatment a foster youth would receive if not placed in the foster care system. new text end new text begin (e) "Belongings" means personal effects or possessions as defined reasonably by the foster youth. new text end new text begin (f) "Chemical restraint" means the use of any psychopharmacologic drug that is used for discipline or convenience and is not required to treat medical symptoms. new text end new text begin (g) "Clean" means a space that is free from accumulations of dirt, grease, garbage, peeling paint, vermin, and insects. The area must also be free from animal feces and urine on carpets, floors, or furniture. The conditions must not have a direct impact on the health and safety of the foster youth. new text end new text begin (h) "Consent" means words or overt actions by a person indicating a freely given present agreement. Consent does not mean the existence of a prior or current social relationship between the actor and the complainant or that the complainant failed to resist a particular act. new text end new text begin (i) "Culturally appropriate" means practices, resources, or services that reflect, honor, and celebrate a foster youth's cultural background, such as foods, clothing, personal care products, traditions, values, and social norms. new text end new text begin (j) "Developmentally appropriate" means activities, resources, education, or information suitable for the foster youth's age, cognitive level, and emotional maturity. new text end new text begin (k) "Disability" has the meaning given in section 363A.03, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (l) "Discipline" means actions utilized to correct or deter negative or harmful behaviors. Discipline must be aimed at fostering positive behavior, including teaching and modeling skills to achieve those behaviors. Discipline must be constructive and supportive, and free from physical punishment, confinement, restraint, or withholding of basic needs. new text end new text begin (m) "Discrimination" means the unfair treatment of a person or group of people differently from other people, often because of age, race, sex, nationality, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, religion, or disability. new text end new text begin (n) "Excessive medication" means medication administered as a substitute for a behavioral or therapeutic program, for punishment, for the convenience of any foster parents or care providers, in quantities that interfere with learning or other social-emotional goals, or that goes beyond prescribed limits, as determined by a licensed health care professional. new text end new text begin (o) "Foster youth" means an individual under 18 years of age and who is in foster care as defined under section 260C.007, subdivision 18, or 260D.02, subdivision 10. For the purposes of this section, foster youth also includes individuals under age 21 who are in foster care pursuant to section 260C.451. new text end new text begin (p) "Group punishment" means collective punishment, given to one or more foster youth regardless of whether their individual behavior warranted the punishment, except for the imposition of restrictions on the foster youth's peer group as part of a recognized treatment program. new text end new text begin (q) "Harassment" means words, behaviors, or actions that cause the person it is directed at to feel scared, annoyed, or emotionally upset. new text end new text begin (r) "Health care or health care services" means medical, dental, vision, and mental health services, treatments, and procedures. new text end new text begin (s) "Medically prescribed diet" means a diet specifically recommended by a medical professional to support a foster youth's health, which must be respected and adhered to in all care settings. new text end new text begin (t) "Neglect" means the denial or omission of physical, emotional, mental, and psychological needs when considering factors such as the child's age and physical and mental ability. This can include the denial or omission of the rights enumerated in this section. new text end new text begin (u) "Physical discipline" means physical harm acted upon a foster youth to punish or correct the foster youth's behavior. new text end new text begin (v) "Physical restraint" means any manual method or physical or mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or adjacent to someone's body that the individual cannot remove easily which restricts freedom of movement or normal access to one's body. Restraints should only be used for a small amount of time and used in the least restrictive way possible. new text end new text begin (w) "Privacy" means to be free from the attention of others. This may include physical privacy or verbal confidentiality. new text end new text begin (x) "Safety" means free from physical, mental, or emotional harm or potential harm. new text end new text begin (y) "Seclusion" has the meaning given in section 245.8261, subdivision 3j. new text end new text begin (z) "Sexualization" means treating someone as an object of sexual desire. This may include but is not limited to sexual comments, gestures, body language, or difference in treatment from others based on sexual reasonings. new text end new text begin (aa) "Sibling" means any individual who shares at least one biological or adoptive parent with the foster youth or any individual that the child considers a sibling and has previously lived with the child, regardless of whether a biological or legal relationship exists between the foster youth and sibling. new text end new text begin (bb) "Trafficking" means labor trafficking as defined in section 609.281, subdivision 5, and sex trafficking as defined in section 609.321, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Physical and emotional safety. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to be safe. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) appropriate discipline and caregiving that considers the foster youth's unique history and needs. This includes the right to be free from all physical discipline; new text end new text begin (2) be free from physical, verbal, and sexual abuse, including exploitation and trafficking; new text end new text begin (3) the rights, protections, and services under section 260C.212, subdivision 13, and Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3080; new text end new text begin (4) be free from group punishment; new text end new text begin (5) be free from seclusion, in accordance with the laws and policies governing secure facilities; new text end new text begin (6) be free from physical or chemical restraint used for the purposes of discipline or convenience. De-escalation tactics should be exhausted before these are considered, and the least restrictive interventions should be prioritized. Any physical or chemical restraint of the foster youth must be documented and shared with the court; new text end new text begin (7) be free from threats of placement disruption or law enforcement involvement. These must not be used as a threat, retaliation, or discipline; new text end new text begin (8) appropriate supervision and to be free from neglect; new text end new text begin (9) be free from discrimination based on the foster youth's protected class status. This includes but is not limited to the denial or delay of placement or services, more restrictive placement options, physical or emotional isolation, abuse, neglect, or discipline based on these identities; new text end new text begin (10) have appropriate actions taken to keep the foster youth safe and comfortable, if the foster youth shares any information regarding previous or ongoing abuse or sexualization to the foster youth's family and permanency team. This includes access to accommodations so that the foster youth does not need to face a person who harmed the foster youth while exercising their rights, including attending court; new text end new text begin (11) bodily autonomy. This includes being able to refuse physical touch or emotional affection, including but not limited to hugs and kisses; new text end new text begin (12) an age and developmentally appropriate curfew and house rules that are clear and consistent, and explained to the foster youth in a way the foster youth can understand. If the foster youth is living in a residential treatment facility, licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program, qualified residential treatment program, secure detention facility, or shelter care facility as defined in section 260C.007, the foster youth should have access to written rules or policies upon entering and at the foster youth's request; and new text end new text begin (13) be provided with alternative pathways in juvenile delinquency court, if available, which may include diversionary courts and restorative or transformative justice circles or practices. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Basic needs and normalcy. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to have their basic needs met and experience childhood and adolescence in a way similar to peers who are not in foster care. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) not have the foster youth's basic needs withheld as a form of discipline. This includes but is not limited to the foster youth's usual diet, drinking water, clothing, shoes, hygiene facilities, hygiene products, hair care products, medications, menstrual products, comfortable and normal sleeping conditions, proper lighting, educational services, privacy, self-regulation tools, exercise activities, ventilation and proper temperature, visitations, positive reinforcement, nurturing, or health care; new text end new text begin (2) sufficient food and beverages that promote the foster youth's health and nutrition, that are in accordance with the foster youth's religious, spiritual, and cultural observances, that follow the foster youth's medically prescribed diet, and that align with any allergy needs or food aversions. Food must be palatable, of adequate quantity and variety, served at appropriate temperatures, and of the same quality as food others in the household eat; new text end new text begin (3) not be put on a diet to lose or gain weight unless under the direction of a health care professional; new text end new text begin (4) clothing that fits comfortably, sufficiently protects against outside elements, is of the same or similar quality as the clothes other children in the household wear, and is in accordance with the foster youth's gender expression, and religious, cultural, and spiritual identities and beliefs; new text end new text begin (5) dress themselves and pick out the foster youth's own clothing, as developmentally appropriate; new text end new text begin (6) have access to a bedroom, whenever safe and appropriate, in the place where the foster youth is living; new text end new text begin (7) have access to a clean home and safe methods and products for the foster youth to clean themselves and the foster youth's belongings; new text end new text begin (8) have access to safe, appropriate, and sufficient menstrual products with consideration of the foster youth's preferences; new text end new text begin (9) have access to a comfortable and clean place to sleep that is furnished to the same or similar quality to other rooms; new text end new text begin (10) the foster youth's own personal belongings that the foster youth is not required to share with others; new text end new text begin (11) acquire more belongings and bring the foster youth's belongings with if the foster youth needs to move to a new placement; new text end new text begin (12) have the space to store personal belongings, including hygiene items, clothes, sentimental belongings, and religious or spiritual altars, artifacts, books, or pieces. This includes the right to have private access to those belongings, if reasonable; new text end new text begin (13) appropriate travel bags to pack the foster youth's belongings if the foster youth needs to move that do not include trash or grocery bags; new text end new text begin (14) have access to a method of communication that is appropriate for the foster youth's age and developmental level, which may include a cell phone; new text end new text begin (15) the foster youth's own money that the foster youth has earned or has been gifted, and which should not be used to pay for the foster youth's basic needs; new text end new text begin (16) support to open and access the foster youth's own bank account, as developmentally appropriate, which should not be accessed or borrowed from by others; new text end new text begin (17) have the foster youth's credit frozen upon entry into foster care at any age and support in unfreezing and refreezing the foster youth's credit upon the foster youth's request if the foster youth is 15 years of age or older; new text end new text begin (18) receive a yearly credit report. If a foster youth's credit is being used fraudulently, the responsible social service agency will support the foster youth by amending any discrepancies; and new text end new text begin (19) have chores and tasks assigned to the foster youth to be typical for the foster youth's age and development and comparable to other children in the home, if applicable, which includes a consideration of the type, volume, and duration of the chores and tasks. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Privacy. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to privacy. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) communication privacy. A foster youth's communication can only be monitored due to a safety concern and if a safety concern is determined, the monitoring of any communication must be communicated to the foster youth and documented in the foster youth's out-of-home placement plan. Communication may include but is not limited to technology usage or personal belongings, including writings and artwork; new text end new text begin (2) change clothes, bathe, and use the bathroom privately, as developmentally appropriate and safe; new text end new text begin (3) data privacy. Details of the foster youth's personal history must only be shared as permitted by law and necessary to ensure the foster youth's safety and well-being; new text end new text begin (4) request for the court to make the foster youth's medical and therapeutic information confidential from the public, as allowed by law; new text end new text begin (5) only have cameras in common areas and not to have cameras in areas such as bathrooms, bedrooms, or areas in which the foster youth is expected to bathe and change clothing; and new text end new text begin (6) be free from unreasonable searches of the foster youth's personal belongings, space, or body. Searches must be based on an articulated and individualized need that must be as minimally invasive as possible in relation to that need. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Health and wellness. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to be healthy and receive high quality health care. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) timely access and transportation to health care services, as recommended by the foster youth's health care team and upon the foster youth's request; new text end new text begin (2) have the foster youth's health care explained in a manner the foster youth can understand by the provider, social worker, or other professional, to have the foster youth's concerns addressed, to meet with the foster youth's provider in private, and to have a trusted adult present if the foster youth wants one; new text end new text begin (3) be free from excessive or unnecessary medication, procedures, or treatments. Determinations for excessiveness can be made by a licensed health care professional; new text end new text begin (4) be free from consumption of drugs, alcohol, or medications which are not prescribed to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (5) give input on the foster youth's health care providers, including selecting health care providers or switching a provider for any reason; new text end new text begin (6) not have details of the foster youth's health care shared with anyone without the foster youth's consent, unless it impacts the foster youth's safety or the care provided to the foster youth, as developmentally appropriate and in accordance with the law; new text end new text begin (7) access or refuse contraceptives and abortion services, unless a health care professional determines it to be medically necessary; new text end new text begin (8) be free from secondhand smoke exposure; new text end new text begin (9) have decisions made regarding the foster youth's health care be only between the foster youth and a health care provider, as developmentally appropriate and in accordance with the law, unless medically necessary circumstances arise; new text end new text begin (10) be free from drug testing as a condition of the foster youth's placement, unless ordered by a judge or part of an evidence-based substance use treatment program; new text end new text begin (11) have support in accessing or refusing family therapy with anyone the foster youth considers a relative, unless required by the foster youth's out-of-home placement plan; new text end new text begin (12) have support in accessing an alternative mental health treatment option of the foster youth's preference; new text end new text begin (13) have support in accessing education and services regarding consent, healthy relationships, and sexual and reproductive health and safety, as developmentally appropriate; and new text end new text begin (14) be informed of and supported in accessing counseling and mental health support, including resources at school. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Family and relative connections. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to be connected to family, relatives, and kin. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) be supported in having frequent, consistent, and quality contact with relatives, including both in-person or virtual opportunities, with in-person visits being preferred. Other communications such as letters, emails, texts, or phone calls should be supported; new text end new text begin (2) have contact or visits with relatives only be restricted in circumstances when the foster youth's family and permanency team has collaboratively weighed factors, including but not limited to the foster youth's physical and emotional safety; the input of the foster youth's health care team, when applicable; the foster youth's own input; and whether alternative forms of visits or contact may be appropriate; new text end new text begin (3) have the foster youth's caseworker notify the foster youth's relatives who responded to the initial search, regardless of whether the relative indicated interest in being a placement option, or relatives identified by the foster youth, when the foster youth moved to a new placement, within five business days of the caseworker being informed of the placement change; new text end new text begin (4) be told in a personal and confidential manner if a relative of the foster youth dies or is experiencing life-threatening health issues when the agency is aware. When practicable, to be supported in attending any death-related services if someone the foster youth knew dies or to visit a person who is experiencing life-threatening health issues; new text end new text begin (5) have an updated relative search be completed, at minimum, every six months to reevaluate relative and kinship placement and connection opportunities for the foster youth, if the foster youth is not already placed in a relative or kinship placement; new text end new text begin (6) have the foster youth's caseworker update the courts regarding the caseworker's efforts to support sibling relationships at each court hearing; new text end new text begin (7) have the foster youth's family and permanency team make every effort to support relationships with all of the foster youth's siblings, including adult siblings, whether the siblings are in foster care or not, unless the agency has documented a verifiable safety concern. This support must include: new text end new text begin (i) having the foster youth's input prioritized regarding any sibling relationships. This may include how often and the methods for communication, including phone calls, letters, or in-person or virtual visits; new text end new text begin (ii) frequent contact and support in contacting the foster youth's siblings. This includes weekly regular face-to-face visits, whenever possible, and weekly virtual contact. Virtual contact includes, but is not limited to, telephone calls, text messaging, social media, other internet use, and video calls; new text end new text begin (iii) not withholding or restricting sibling relationships as a consequence for behavior; new text end new text begin (iv) regular visits being ensured by members of the foster youth's family and permanency team and the coordination of dates, times, transportation, and other accommodations as necessary; new text end new text begin (v) the timing and regularity of visits to be outlined in each sibling's service plan; and new text end new text begin (vi) alternative ways to preserve relationships being supported, in the event of a documented verifiable safety concern; new text end new text begin (8) at least quarterly, receive a telephone number, address, or email address for all the foster youth's siblings, both those in foster care and not in foster care, and receive updated photographs of siblings regularly, by regular mail or email; new text end new text begin (9) be actively involved in the lives of the foster youth siblings, including celebrations, and to be provided with support in doing so. Celebrations may include but are not limited to birthdays, holidays, graduations, school and extracurricular activities, cultural customs in the foster youth's native language, and other milestones; new text end new text begin (10) be promptly informed about changes in a sibling's placement or circumstance, including but not limited to new placements, discharge from placements, significant life events, and discharge from foster care; new text end new text begin (11) be included in permanency planning decisions for any siblings; new text end new text begin (12) have the adult siblings of the foster youth be notified of the opportunity to become a foster care provider, adoptive parent, or relative custodian; new text end new text begin (13) have the foster youth's siblings, if known, to be notified of their rights as a sibling, through materials in a format specified by the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson. This includes adult siblings and siblings not in foster care; and new text end new text begin (14) have support in planning to maintain sibling relationships after the foster youth exit foster care for any reason. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Community and cultural connections. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to be connected to the foster youth's community and culture. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) have support in finding and maintaining regular contact with communities that reflect the foster youth's culture, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, and gender identity, with specific attention paid to maintaining the community connections the foster youth had prior to entering foster care. The foster youth's cultural and community needs must be documented in the foster youth's out-of-home placement plan; new text end new text begin (2) be cared for by people that have received training on understanding and validating the foster youth's cultural, racial, and ethnic heritage in a trauma-informed manner; new text end new text begin (3) ethnically and culturally appropriate hygiene and hair care products and services, which may include access to protective hairstyling services, bonnets, du rags, lotions, shampoo, conditioner, and body wash; new text end new text begin (4) have support in accessing education in personal care, hygiene, and grooming that reflects the foster youth's race, ethnicity, culture, and gender identity; new text end new text begin (5) have support to make and cultivate friendships, including connections made before the foster youth's time in foster care or while in a previous placement. Connections should be supported through in-person or virtual opportunities, with preference for in-person visits. Letters, emails, texts, or phone calls should also be supported. The foster youth's communications with friends must only be limited due to safety or well-being concerns of the foster youth; new text end new text begin (6) speak and be spoken to in the foster youth's own language, which may include Braille or sign language. If the foster youth's foster parent or caregiver does not know the foster youth's language, the foster youth's caseworker will provide a plan to meet the foster youth's needs to communicate; and new text end new text begin (7) have support in accessing online or in-person peer support groups that are age-appropriate, and that may include support or affinity groups that align with the foster youth's protected class status. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Religious and spiritual practices. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have rights regarding religious and spiritual practices. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) participate in cultural, religious, and spiritual events and practices that are meaningful to the foster youth. This may include private spaces and materials to practice the foster youth's religion or spirituality, including but not limited to the ability to smudge, light incense, or light candles, and a designated area to do this; new text end new text begin (2) choose not to participate in cultural, religious, and spiritual events and practices; and new text end new text begin (3) be in a placement that is informed and respectful of the foster youth's religious and spiritual practices and needs. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Sexual orientation and gender identity. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have rights regarding sexual orientation and gender identity. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) have the foster youth's sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression affirmed and supported. This includes the right for the foster youth to express themselves in the way the foster youth decides, including but not limited to the foster youth's hair styles, makeup choices, chosen pronouns, chosen name, and the way the foster youth dresses, including gender-affirming undergarments; new text end new text begin (2) request and be supported in obtaining gender-affirming care including counseling, medication, and other supportive services; new text end new text begin (3) privacy regarding the foster youth's sexual orientation and gender identity. Whenever possible, to not have the foster youth's gender identity or sexual orientation disclosed without consent; and new text end new text begin (4) not experience conversion or reparative therapies. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Disability and accommodation. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have rights regarding disability status and accommodation. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) receive proper and reasonable accommodation and services to help the foster youth thrive in the foster youth's placement and at school, which may include support in obtaining full access to education; new text end new text begin (2) be in a placement that is educated about the foster youth's disability and the accommodations the foster youth may need; new text end new text begin (3) the same access to age or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as the foster youth's peers and given accommodations to participate in such experiences; and new text end new text begin (4) not be excluded from participation in or be denied benefits of the services, programs, or activities due to the foster youth's disability status. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Education. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have rights regarding school and education. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) have support to attend school in a consistent setting, which may include staying in the same school throughout the foster youth's time in foster care and attending the same school as the foster youth's siblings, if possible. This includes timely transportation that is free of cost to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (2) have support to ensure all credits, including partial credits, received in different schools or placements be counted if the foster youth were to move schools; new text end new text begin (3) have support to ensure that the foster youth does not receive a reduction of a grade due to the foster youth's foster care status and any foster care related absences and circumstances; new text end new text begin (4) be provided with recovery options in the foster youth's classes during school hours, if possible, when these circumstances occur; new text end new text begin (5) have support to be free from disciplinary action at school due to the foster youth's foster care status. This can include but is not limited to detention or suspension regarding lateness or absence from school due to foster care related circumstances; new text end new text begin (6) not have the foster youth's scheduled activities, including school, disrupted by foster care-related meetings and events, if possible, in accordance with the foster youth's preferences or if there is a safety need or necessity; new text end new text begin (7) only have the foster youth's foster care status or personal information disclosed to necessary staff members at the foster youth's school; new text end new text begin (8) have support in accessing quality education that is equivalent or better than what the foster youth would receive if the foster youth were not in foster care. This may include access to the materials and time needed to complete the foster youth's homework; new text end new text begin (9) have support from the foster youth's family and permanency team to graduate high school in a timely manner and in a similar timeframe to the foster youth's peers; new text end new text begin (10) have support in enrolling in any accelerated and college-level courses and programs the foster youth is qualified to enroll in, including timely support to prepare for postsecondary education; new text end new text begin (11) have support in accessing extra help and tutoring if needed; new text end new text begin (12) make choices about the foster youth's classes in accordance with the foster youth's school's requirements and policies; and new text end new text begin (13) own or access to all necessary school supplies. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Activities. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have a right to participate in various activities. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) be included in activities with the foster youth's placement, relatives, and friends. This includes but is not limited to birthdays, special celebrations, holidays, and vacations; new text end new text begin (2) participate in age and developmentally appropriate activities that align with the foster youth's preferences and to not be denied access to an activity based on the fact that the foster youth is in foster care. This includes but is not limited to social activities, school events, sports, arts programming, clubs, community activities, and other extracurriculars; new text end new text begin (3) have support in ensuring continuation of activities if the foster youth's foster care status or related circumstances affects the foster youth's participation or attendance; and new text end new text begin (4) timely transportation to activities that is free of cost to the foster youth. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Case management and planning. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have rights regarding case management and planning. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) a guardian ad litem and caseworker; new text end new text begin (2) be involved with case planning, including having a current out-of-home placement plan, receiving a copy of the placement plan, having the contents of the placement plan explained to the foster youth in a developmentally appropriate and accessible manner, helping create and edit the plan, and having it updated every six months and upon request; new text end new text begin (3) receive contact information for the foster youth's caseworker and guardian ad litem, to be able to contact them when desired and privately, and to receive a response that is reasonably prompt; new text end new text begin (4) timely, quality, and private visits with the foster youth's caseworker and guardian ad litem at least in-person every 30 days, including if the foster youth is out of state; new text end new text begin (5) be represented by and communicate with an attorney if the foster youth is ten years of age or older, to have the right to an attorney be explained to the foster youth, to receive contact information for the foster youth's attorney and contact them when desired and confidentially, and to request and receive a new attorney, as available; new text end new text begin (6) be supported in seeking equitable relief within the underlying dependency case; new text end new text begin (7) know why the foster youth is in foster care and what will or might happen to the foster youth while in foster care, explained to the foster youth by the agency in a developmentally appropriate and accessible manner; new text end new text begin (8) translation support for all court hearings, foster care-related meetings, and materials if needed or requested; new text end new text begin (9) participate in and attend all court hearings and receive transportation to court hearings. This includes being told about the foster youth's right to attend court with as much advance notice as possible for each hearing, both by court administration in writing and verbally by the foster youth's caseworker; new text end new text begin (10) communicate with the court through the foster youth's family and permanency team and attorney, if applicable, or directly in a court setting that is open to other parties; new text end new text begin (11) if the foster youth has an attorney, to have court processes and participation explained to the foster youth in an age and developmentally appropriate way; new text end new text begin (12) have the foster youth's input prioritized in decision-making by the foster youth's family and permanency team; new text end new text begin (13) select two people to be on the foster youth's family and permanency team. Upon the foster youth's request, these two people may attend meetings instead of the foster youth; new text end new text begin (14) select one member of the foster youth's family and permanency team to be the foster youth's advisor. This person can also advocate for the foster youth about how parenting decisions will apply; new text end new text begin (15) give input on where the foster youth will live, including: new text end new text begin (i) being placed in the least restrictive placement possible. If the considerations regarding the least restrictive placement change, other less restrictive placement options must be evaluated; new text end new text begin (ii) being in a placement that affirms and supports the foster youth's identities; new text end new text begin (iii) requesting to have the placement changed if it is not affirming of the foster youth's identities; new text end new text begin (iv) having placement with the foster youth's relatives prioritized over nonrelatives in accordance with the foster youth's preferences, as developmentally appropriate; new text end new text begin (v) being in the same placement as any siblings, whenever possible; new text end new text begin (vi) asking the court to consider a relative as the foster youth's adoptive placement; and new text end new text begin (vii) not being placed in a juvenile detention facility for more than 24 hours due to foster care status; new text end new text begin (16) be placed in close geographical distance to any siblings to facilitate frequent and meaningful contact, if placement together is not possible; new text end new text begin (17) receive as much advance notice as possible before a transition to a new placement and to be informed about what the foster youth can expect, including but not limited to placement location and type, where the foster youth will sleep, if the foster youth will have roommates, and any changes in the foster youth's life that will result in this placement change; new text end new text begin (18) have support from the foster youth's caseworker to navigate how the foster youth can obtain legal permanent residency or Tribal enrollment, if applicable; and new text end new text begin (19) have support from the foster youth's family and permanency team to advocate for the foster youth's rights. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Transition resources and support. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have rights regarding the transition to adulthood. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) request, receive, and give input on an independent living plan once the foster youth is 14 years of age and to review the foster youth's independent living plan regularly and upon request; new text end new text begin (2) receive appropriate resources to meet the objectives of the foster youth's independent living plan, including but not limited to educational and vocational resources, mental and physical health management, life skills, financial literacy, insurance, and social and recreational skills; new text end new text begin (3) remain or enroll in extended foster care until the foster youth is 21 years of age if the foster youth does not have a legally permanent family when the foster youth is 18 years of age and meets eligibility requirements. This may include being exempted due to a medical condition, which can include a medical emergency, disability, childbirth, or pregnancy. If the foster youth is eligible, the foster youth must be notified in writing of the enrollment at least six months prior to the foster youth's 18th birthday. The foster youth will be automatically enrolled into extended foster care on the foster youth's 18th birthday and receive all associated support and benefits, unless the foster youth otherwise notifies the foster youth's caseworker with a signed form created by the commissioner of children, youth, and families; new text end new text begin (4) receive notice at least 60 days before case management services end, or as soon as the foster youth's caseworker or the court is aware, whichever is sooner, if the foster youth is 18 years of age or older and under 24 years of age. The foster youth can appeal this decision within the agency or the court to review the termination of case management services; new text end new text begin (5) request, receive, and give input on a transition plan, at least six months before the foster youth ages out of foster care or if the foster youth is 17 years and six months of age. This plan may include but is not limited to housing options; health insurance, including medical assistance; education options; mentoring opportunities; workforce supports and employment services; a copy of the foster youth's consumer credit report; health care directive; contact information if the foster youth needs help with a crisis situation before the foster youth is 21 years old; and official documentation to show the foster youth was in foster care. A foster youth has the right to receive support from the foster youth's caseworker in accessing these services and resources; new text end new text begin (6) request and receive social and medical history and genetic health conditions of the foster youth's biological family, if available, upon discharge from foster care. If the foster youth is 18 years of age or older when exiting foster care, to receive these records from the foster youth's caseworker; new text end new text begin (7) receive the foster youth's social security card; an official or certified copy of the foster youth's birth certificate; a state identification card or driver's license; Tribal enrollment identification card; green card or school visa; health insurance information; the foster youth's health care records; a contact list of the foster youth's health care providers; social and educational history and records; and contact information for the foster youth's siblings, if they are in foster care, at no cost to the foster youth if the foster youth is 18 years of age or older when exiting foster care; new text end new text begin (8) support in obtaining the foster youth's vital documents from the foster youth's caseworker, as age-appropriate, at no cost to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (9) maintain employment or professional development opportunities, in accordance with the law and to receive support in accessing transportation to and from these opportunities that is free or low cost to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (10) have support to enroll in and attend a driver's education class and take a permit and driver's license test, as many attempts as it may take, that is free of cost to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (11) own a car, in accordance with the law, and be provided with support by the agency to obtain car insurance; new text end new text begin (12) as reasonably known by the foster youth's caseworker, be notified by the agency of all benefits that the foster youth is eligible to receive during the foster youth's time in foster care at the point when the foster youth is eligible and every six months after and be supported in accessing them. This includes but is not limited to fostering independence grants, education training voucher, free application for federal student aid, fostering youth independence voucher, medical assistance, and extended foster care; new text end new text begin (13) be notified in person by the legally responsible agency and the guardian ad litem, and in a manner that best helps the foster youth understand the information, when a financially responsible agency receives benefits on behalf of the foster youth if the foster youth is 13 years of age or older; new text end new text begin (14) request and receive, in accordance with the law, the foster youth's foster care records upon discharge from foster care or transition to extended foster care, and if the foster youth is 13 years of age or older, to receive official documentation that shows the foster youth was in foster care; new text end new text begin (15) request and be notified if the foster youth has any personal effects that are in the foster youth's file, which may include pictures, letters, notes, or other personal effects; new text end new text begin (16) have support from the foster youth's caseworker to ensure the foster youth has and can maintain safe and stable housing while the foster youth is enrolled in extended foster care; and new text end new text begin (17) be enrolled in medical assistance throughout the foster youth's time in foster care, including extended foster care. If the foster youth is in the foster care system when the foster youth turns 18 years of age, the foster youth has a right to maintain eligibility for medical assistance until the foster youth turns 26 years of age. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Pregnant and parenting. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth who are pregnant or parenting have rights. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) legal and physical custody of the foster youth's child, unless otherwise determined by a court order; new text end new text begin (2) receive clear and accurate information regarding the foster youth's parental rights from the foster youth's caseworker; new text end new text begin (3) be informed of the foster youth's legal rights relating to paternity and child support, and to receive support in engaging with related court processes upon request by the foster youth; new text end new text begin (4) have support from the foster youth's family and permanency team in maintaining the foster youth's parental rights through: new text end new text begin (i) accessing any resources needed to adequately and safely care for the foster youth's child, including affordable child care; new text end new text begin (ii) ensuring that the foster youth's absence from school due to pregnancy, birth, or parenting circumstances does not result in punishment or a delay in the foster youth's educational development and progress; and new text end new text begin (iii) accessing health care appointments and services for the foster youth and the foster youth's children, including transportation that is at no cost to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (5) access services to support the foster youth's birth plan and postpartum needs and resources needed to ensure these services are free or low-cost to the foster youth; new text end new text begin (6) access resources to establish a health care directive and will for the foster youth and the foster youth's children; new text end new text begin (7) access proper and reasonable accommodations in school and work if the foster youth becomes pregnant or parenting while in foster care; new text end new text begin (8) determine the foster youth's own birth and parenting plans, in collaboration with the foster youth's birth services provider, and that is aligned with the foster youth's religious, spiritual, cultural, racial, and ethnic identities; new text end new text begin (9) certain rights if the foster youth is not the primary caregiver of the foster youth's child, which include: new text end new text begin (i) support to coparent, if and when possible and safe; new text end new text begin (ii) support in attending regular visitations and overnights with the foster youth's children in the foster youth's choice of location, in accordance with custody orders; and new text end new text begin (iii) regular contact with the foster youth's child, which may include in-person and virtual visits, phone calls, and letters; new text end new text begin (10) not be coerced into terminating the foster youth's parental rights. The foster youth should not have to choose between staying in the foster youth's placement, receiving services, or accessing basic needs, and maintaining the foster youth's parental rights; new text end new text begin (11) be placed with the foster youth's children in a setting as family-like as possible; new text end new text begin (12) provide recommendations of where the foster youth would like the foster youth's children to live if the foster youth's children are removed from the foster youth's care or the foster youth willingly chooses to release them from the foster youth's care; new text end new text begin (13) not have the foster youth or the foster youth's children drug tested solely due to the foster youth's foster care status, in accordance with the law; and new text end new text begin (14) only be subjected to a paternity test as authorized by law. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Feedback, complaints, and grievances. new text end new text begin While in foster care, foster youth have the right to information and to give feedback regarding the foster youth's rights. This includes a foster youth's right to: new text end new text begin (1) confidentially provide feedback, share a concern, make a complaint, or file a grievance and have that feedback be directed to the foster youth's placement, the agency, the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson, or another complaint body. These can be related to: new text end new text begin (i) the conduct of a person on the foster youth's family and permanency team; new text end new text begin (ii) the quality of care received in the foster youth's foster care placement; new text end new text begin (iii) services the foster youth is receiving or should be receiving; new text end new text begin (iv) if previously shared concerns, complaints, or feedback are unresolved; and new text end new text begin (v) a violation or confusion regarding the rights enumerated under this section; new text end new text begin (2) file a complaint or grievance regarding the foster youth's caseworker, guardian ad litem, attorney, or placement. The foster youth may request instructions on submitting a complaint or grievance from any person on this list or the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson. The instructions must include: new text end new text begin (i) who to address a complaint to; new text end new text begin (ii) the manner to bring a complaint forward; new text end new text begin (iii) the timeframe to expect to receive a response; new text end new text begin (iv) possible actions that may be taken as a result of the complaint; and new text end new text begin (v) that the foster youth cannot face any retaliation, punishment, or discrimination as a result of exercising this right; new text end new text begin (3) receive materials related to the foster youth's rights, which must include: new text end new text begin (i) materials relating to the bill of rights under this section and the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson, in a format specified by the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson; new text end new text begin (ii) receiving the materials under item (i) from the foster youth's caseworker when entering or re-entering foster care and at least every six months, or upon the foster youth's request; new text end new text begin (iii) signing a verification that the foster youth has received the materials under item (i) every six months; and new text end new text begin (iv) a copy of the bill of rights under this section that is easily accessible to the foster youth, either posted in a common area or the foster youth's own copy; new text end new text begin (4) have any person file a grievance with the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson on the foster youth's behalf; new text end new text begin (5) ask for anything the foster youth needs, including the rights under this section or under any other law. The foster youth must not be retaliated against or disciplined for asking for, accessing, reporting, or raising concern about accessing the rights under this section or any other law. The rights under this section or any other law must not be taken away from the foster youth as discipline or retaliation; new text end new text begin (6) receive intervention and remedy if the foster youth's rights are being violated. If a person is in violation of the foster youth's rights under this section or any other law, and the caseworker is aware, the caseworker must intervene and remedy the violation of rights to the extent possible. If the foster youth's caseworker is in violation of the foster youth's rights, the agency must intervene and remedy the violation of rights to the extent possible. The foster youth may be present, at the foster youth's option, during meetings or hearings regarding the violation of the foster youth's rights; new text end new text begin (7) if the foster youth reports any violation of rights to the foster youth's family and permanency team, to have the family and permanency team to report the violation of the foster youth's rights to the foster youth's caseworker, or if the caseworker is violating the rights of the foster youth, to the agency. The foster youth's caseworker or the agency must submit any reported violation to the court; and new text end new text begin (8) have the juvenile court issue any necessary orders to any party, including the agency, any state agency, guardian ad litem, foster parents, or placement provider, upon appropriate motion by any party, to ensure the foster youth is provided with the rights enumerated under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end